Washington statutes.
RCW 39.100.040

Benefit zone ordinance, publicizing and delivery—Challenges to benefit zone formation.

(1) A local government that adopts an ordinance creating a benefit zone under this chapter shall, within ninety days of adopting the ordinance:

(a) Publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation within the benefit zone that describes the public improvement, describes the boundaries of the benefit zone, and identifies the location and times where the ordinance and other public information concerning the public improvement may be inspected; and

(b) Deliver a certified copy of the ordinance to the county treasurer, the county assessor, the department of revenue, and the governing body of each participating taxing authority within which the benefit zone is located.

(2) Any challenge to the formation shall be brought within sixty days of the later of the date of its formation or July 1, 2007. All parties, including the holders of bonds payable from tax revenue under chapter 266, Laws of 2007, may rely upon the presumption of validity of formation of the benefit zone following the expiration of the sixty-day period.

[ 2007 c 266 s 5; 2006 c 111 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Application—Effective date—2007 c 266: See notes following RCW 39.100.010.